Oklahoma, session 2025, SB208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-112B of Title 29, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Wildlife Conservation shall, for the
safety and security of landowners and hunters in this state, create
a system of registration and licensing for any person or entity
providing guiding services in this state, excluding those services
provided for commercial hunting facilities and landowners providing
guiding services on their own property.
B. The Department shall promulgate all rules necessary to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 8th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 208 Page 2